Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-502
Omitted.

Reference to Federal Rule 502 "Required reports privileged by statute" has been omitted. Nebraska Evidence Rules have no corresponding section and for that reason the Nebraska citation of section 27-502 has also been omitted.